Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF715.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 1724YH (1) 91 ss/ns H.F. 715 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 69.21 Members of Congress ââ 1 automatic resignation. 2 1. A United States senator or representative in Congress 3 who has been elected by the people of this state shall be 4 deemed to have resigned from office pursuant to section 69.4 5 if the Congress of the United States fails to pass a budget by 6 October 31 of each year or if the member votes for a continuing 7 resolution providing for the automatic extension of funding. 8 2. The office of a United States senator or representative 9 in Congress deemed to have resigned pursuant to this section 10 shall be deemed vacant and shall be filled as provided in this 11 chapter. 12